Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-403
Structures; erection, maintenance in excess of one hundred fifty feet; permit required.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, without having first applied for and obtained a permit in writing from the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation, to build, erect, or maintain any structure within the State of Nebraska, the height of which exceeds one hundred fifty feet above the surface of the ground at point of installation.

Laws 1955, c. 7, § 3, p. 68;

Laws 1963, c. 17, § 1, p. 96;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 65.